%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 2:24:32 PM
From:The Dodgy Ticker
EKS,
I've been lurking for some time now and enjoy this thread. Finally decided to
post since you're attracted to shipping, as am I (retired and looking for
dividend values for income). I also own SFL and wonder if you (or anyone else)
has/have opinions on DSX, EGLE, and SSW, of which I'm also interested.

Best regards to all, and wishes for a great New Year.

Bob
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 2:32:45 PM
From:bruwin
I'm glad to hear that Madharry. Wouldn't like to think you'd taken my comment
the wrong way !
Yes, I agree, 20/20 hindsight is a great science, ... and luxury. Which is why
I prefer to put my comments on record and let their outcome speak for
themselves.
I must say, Google is a real anomaly in the world of stock market investment. I
stated, way back, in other chat rooms that I wouldn't have bought Google at a
P/E ratio of over 100. In those days its price must have been in the $250
dollar range. It's now at $416 with a 12 month trailing P/E of 83.5 !
I may be wrong, but I think a large part of Google’s success lies in the fact
that its Management doesn’t allow its business plan to remain "static". They’re
always on the lookout to find new ways to expand the business and find new
avenues of growth. In one way, you could say that they’re continually
"re-inventing" their business. This probably attracts investors as they
perceive ongoing increase in EPS etc.. etc...
Best wishes with your investments in 2006.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 2:40:47 PM
From:Broken_Clock
Paul
The housing market has been in a 10 year recovery. Looking ahead, sales are
cooling very, very quickly. Considering that there is abundant 2nd home
vacancies in many bubble areas, I see continued weakness ahead. Be very
careful.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 3:47:35 PM
From:E_K_S
Hi Bob - I am no expert on the shipping group as I only have been following the
sector for the past year. I was attracted to the sector by the global growth
prospects. I believe that what the rail and trucking industry has achieved in
the last 10 years w/ expanding their domestic infrastructure (better
efficiencies & integration), the shipping sector (both dry bulk and tanker)
will do the same in the next 7-10 years. This is a direct result of global
demand growth. It's going to be the well run shippers and those that integrate
new technologies (RFID tags, real time logistic tracking & scheduling,
efficient distribution) that should benefit in this global growth.

I have noticed that this last year there has been a lot of consolidation and
new IPO's of the mom and pop shippers. Many of these shippers have taken on
huge amounts of debt to build up their fleets. What has to occur is more
consolidation but by large land, air & sea conglomerates that build technology
savvy integrated distribution companies. This is the macro view I am looking
at.

Many of the specific small bulk carriers still have marginally small fleets,
are generally leveraged w/ huge amounts of debt and are subject to seasonal
daily rate fluctuations. The better approach is for management to utilize
longer term leases as this helps them manage their cash flows.

I have not really looked at many of the other carriers but from your list DSX,
EGLE and SSW , I would prefer the companies with the smallest debt. That would
be DSX (Diana Shipping Inc.). Their dividend is not bad either at $1.86/share
(15%).

http://finance.yahoo.com/q/cq?d=v1&s=DSX%2cEGLE%2cSSW

The value investor wants to buy these cash flows at a resonable price. At
current prices they seem quite reasonable when compared to the rail and air
transportation freight carriers. The typical PE for a dry bulk carrier is 4-7.
The integrated rail, land & air shippers have much higher PE's.

For the long term it is going to be the management (operators) and how
efficient they run their business. As the industry consolidates, it's going to
be the large conglomerate that will pay the big bucks for a take over. They
will base their decision on the current "in place" management and their track
record (and experience) for operating an efficient fleet.

I do know that many of these shippers are subject to wide seasonal (multi-year)
price cycles. This does not make for a good stock during the bad cycle periods
but when they are doing good, they generate huge cash flows (and pay very large
dividends).

EKS
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 4:19:03 PM
From:bruwin
Well MC, I hear what you say and respect your opinion, But ...
I think I must have missed something along the way, because it seems to me that
a lot hinges around your’s and my definition of what "Value" is, how it’s
defined, and what the prime intention was in setting up this "Value Investing"
Board in the first place.
I get the impression, from what you say, that what you and others on this Board
are looking for, are currently undervalued stocks that have a currently
unrecognised inherent value which, if bought now, will reward the investor at a
later date.
Maybe YOU can clear this up for me, once and for all, and state, clearly and
concisely, what YOU regard as the central theme and motivation of this "Value
Investing" Board.
I thought I might find clarification in the Board’s originator, Mike Burry’s,
initial "manifesto" in which he said, "What we are looking for are value plays.
Obscene value plays. In the Graham tradition."
Now I have my own copy of 'Security Analysis, Principles and Technique' (4th.
Ed.) by Graham, Dodd and Cottle. I searched, in vain, for a reference to
"obscene value plays". If you believe there’s a reference in that book that
matches YOUR understanding (and definition) of what a "value stock" is, I’d
certainly appreciate it if you could direct me to it.
The one thing of relevance that I did find in Burry’s "manifesto", to what I
attempt to do on this board, was his invitation that "Schooling in the art of
fundamental analysis is also appropriate here". It seems that he was uniquely
aware that no investor can know all there is about every aspect of stock
analysis. I certainly include myself in this category and am always prepared to
discuss and constructively debate this aspect. In this regard, I’ll be posting
my personal comments and observations about that much used ratio, Price/Sales.
According to my definition of what constitutes "Value", HANS is currently, and
most certainly, a Value stock. In my opinion, as long as its Financial
Fundamentals continue to reflect that state of affairs, it will be reflected in
its stock price.
Now ... until such time as you, or anyone else, can convince me, via a logical
and irrefutable argument, as to why I should not post on this Board, I will
continue to make my presence felt. To quote Paul Senior, "anybody can diddy-bop
into the thread .... it's an <u>un-moderated</u> thread", (Underlining my own).
Based on the nature of the feedback I’ve received, both publicly and privately,
I believe I have something positive to contribute. In this regard, here’s an
(almost) exact extract of a private message I received from a regular Board
member ....
"I think your investments on Value Thread are terrific. Congratulations...
I knew some of those that you had recommended but did not know how ---- you
were." Needless to say, I’ll leave identification up to the individual.
In closing, I can only repeat what I said once before, ... if someone doesn’t
like, or agree, with what I have to say, then they have the option to ignore it
and not read it.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 5:01:26 PM
From:Carl Worth
bruwin:

perhaps, since you clearly won't let the subject go, or respond with posts that
are less than 2000 words in length, you could at least space your posts a bit
more generously, so that they are readable <G>

HANS is trading at 30 times next year's estimated earnings, with a growth rate
of 25% in said year...that is NOT value, as you yourself stated:

 I get the impression, from what you say, that what you and others on this
Board are looking for, are currently undervalued stocks that have a currently
unrecognised inherent value which, if bought now, will reward the investor at a
later date. 

HANS very well may be higher one year from now, but it isn't undervalued at the
current time, to argue such is ludicrous

it's very true that value is in the eye of the beholder, what is value to me
may not be to paul, or to mcsweet, and vice versa

that said, it's equally clear that no true value investor would be buying HANS
at this point...those are the facts, no matter what 2000 words you want to
respond with

EBAY posted strong results for years, and the stock rose commensurate with
those results, but it was never a value stock...those are called GROWTH stocks,
some even look for GARP stocks, but they still aren't value stocks, no matter
how well the share price does

finally, as has been suggested numerous times already, why not just let the
HANS discussion go, you made some good money on it, as did i, but it's not on
topic here, and since you appear to believe you are the supreme stock analyst
of all time, why don't you give us some of your brilliant new ideas so that we
have something to look over through the long weekend <g>

feel free to flame away, but at least limit each paragraph to 7 or 8 lines, and
put a space between the paragraphs...LOL
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 5:09:23 PM
From:Dave
The economics of the Home Building Industry and the economics of the publicly
traded Home Building companies are not driven by rising home prices or their
continuation (or lackthereof).

The "bull view" on homebuilders is that the national players will/(are)
gain/(ing) share on the regional players. With this increased share, the
national players will have higher purchasing power across the board (land,
timber, components)

If this feeds higher unit sales, the equities are CHEAP.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 5:23:08 PM
From:Carl Worth
nice to see WNMLA finally paying off, it certainly hasn't been one of my more
efficient investments, as it finally moves into the green after about 18 months
of waiting, and i will probably trim my position once we reach 2006, since my
gain is now well into long term status <g> the discount to its underlying value
has been closed considerably, and frankly i'm glad to be able to take any
profit after seeing it down as much as 50% from my cost at various times

as for CULS, i have been out of that one for a while, as it became clear that
they weren't making much progress on opening new stores, so i don't see too
much potential for growth there in the near to mid term future...i believe i
noted on dale's thread that i had trimmed my position when it reached 9, and i
later sold the rest at prices above and below that over the course of a few
months

i still have it on my watch list, and would consider buying it again if it fell
back to the kind of discount we bought it at a couple years ago, or if they
started to follow through on their store expansion program...the same store
sales, which used to be consistently in the double digits, are now in the lower
single digits, so they will need something else to move the stock price
significantly higher, IMHO

finally, i have to anonymously thank the poster who mentioned CULS in the first
place, as i believe i first saw it referenced on the TATRADER thread, and while
i have no idea who that person was, perhaps by osmosis he will receive my
thanks <g> in any event, it was an idea well repeated on dale's thread, and
which clearly benefited you and i, even if no one else joined us for the ride
:)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 5:31:08 PM
From:MCsweet
Paul,

I have bot/sold CULS on the dips/peaks and own some now. I would have continued
to own WNMLA except for the slimy management.

I should have kept owning at least a small position in WNMLA (and have owned at
times), as I have made some decent money in companies with slimy management
(tho I have lost some too), and with gold rallying this puppy was bound to go
up.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 5:37:20 PM
From:Carl Worth
i'm curious, why do you see the WNMLA management as slimy?

clearly investors did not reward them for their decision to cease being a
reporting company, but i think their reasons made sense

they don't appear to be overpaid, as the junior winmill makes 100K a year in
salary

perhaps there is something that i'm missing
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 6:04:25 PM
From:bruwin
carl, I'd be surprised if even you understood what you were talking about. And
I won't 'LOL' at your diatribe, it's too sad to be a laughing matter.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 6:52:21 PM
From:gcrispin
EKS,

I purchased DRYS in the last fifteen minutes of trading today. I am setting my
stop below twelve and will see where the January effect takes the share price.
As an IPO this year, my sense that the selling was overdone due to tax reasons
and we'll get a bounce. I appreciate you posting your opinions and selections
in this sector.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 6:57:09 PM
From:Paul Senior
Homebuilders/oil stocks.

"...the economics of the publicly traded Home Building companies are not driven
by rising home prices or their continuation (or lackthereof)."

Perhaps it's about perception vs. reality. Or maybe Graham's weighing machine
vs. voting machine. Difficult to discern what or where truth is. If we just
look at the business results and did not look at what the business is, and we
compare the stock prices now against the financial numbers and ratios for these
companies, the stocks are terrific bargains compared to other stocks in other
sectors. That's how I have made and continue to make my bet here.

Imo, a somewhat similar conventional wisdom situation exists for oil stocks.
That is, I presume that the conventional wisdom is that if oil prices come
down, the oil company stocks will drop too. What the oil companies get for
their oil must be less, so earnings might drop, and even if earnings don't
drop, prospects for the companies are less, and so the oil stocks are less
attractive and will be lower. And for now, as with homebuilders, that is true.
Oil prices have dropped and oil stock prices have dropped. Dropped though from
their highs.

I offer this long-term chart on Exxon, the most conservative of companies (I am
believing), and ask that for a conservative investor with a balanced-type of
portfolio looking for long term holdings (and not someone who's looking for
quick, large gains), has there really ever been a time when XOM was not a
decent buy? It looks to me like XOM has about made the price of oil irrelevant:
The long timeframe of good performance encompasses oil prices spikes - drops,
and rises.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q/bc?s=XOM&t=my

I'd like to believe that profits could be made - in oil stocks/home building
stocks, etc. etc. if one can understand the conventional wisdom, and IF one is
right in the timing and challenging of that consensus.

Jmo, I'm no expert on conventional wisdom or challenging it, and I could be
very wrong in my opinions and bets. And I have been wrong - many, many times.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 8:08:16 PM
From:Carl Worth
i think my post is easily understood, what exactly were the tough portions for
you? <g> oh and i don't mean the tough portions for you to refute, that doesn't
count as hard to understand, only hard to counter

i didn't even use any big words, come on

happy new year
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2005 8:28:23 PM
From:Dave
Paul,

RE: Housing

Many people believe that a house is the "best" investment one will ever make.
On average since the late 70's, houses have appreciated at a real rate of 2.5%
per annum. Of course, the real reason why houses are the "best" investment one
can ever make is the gov't subsidies, i.e. leverage and writeoffs (both
interest expense and gains). To me, 2.5% ain't that great, but some are willing
to accept less; take TIPS for example.

I am in the camp that we could see a flat line in real estate for a while and,
my rationale for this conclusion, is that people do not like selling the house
for less than they paid for it! Remember, at settlement, if selling for a
"loss", one has to write a fairly large check to the mortgage company (assuming
that one is upside down on their loan). Furthermore, to add insult to injury,
one cannot write off their loss on their income taxes.

The key to understanding the home builder sector in my opinion is this:

In the 80's when interest rates were double digit, home builders were building
at least 2x as many homes as they are now!

Furthermore, while there could, in fact, be speculation on either coast of the
U.S., does not mean that houses will not be built and sold profitably between
the coasts.

Lastly, even those people with negative amortizing loans or IOs will not have
their "dose of reality" in 5 or so years.

As such, while the market for pre-existing houses may slow, the economics
behind the home builders will continue to be good since it really doesn't cost
"that" much to build one given the imbedded nature of the costs, i.e. land.

RE: Oil

That really depends upon where you are in that sector, i.e.
upstream/downstream. If a company's business model is more upstream, they are
levered more to the price of crude. If they are more downstream, they are
levered more to the "spread", i.e. difference between crude and refined
products.

Regarding your chart, I believe you are relying too much on history. If you
believe that oil comes from dinosaurs (there is another theory by the way), the
large, integrated oils are "under" investing in E&P activities. Since there is
a limited amount of oil in the ground (given the dinosaur theory) they will run
out of oil and, as such, so will their source of revenue. What will happen in
the future, I have no idea. However, if you are of the belief that oil comes
from dinosaurs, over time the marginal cost of production/extraction of a drop
of oil will continue to increase. But, those that under-invested in E&P
activities will run out.

RE: Value Investing (You didn't mention this, but I've seen some exchanges)

I think this is where we disagree. As "Value Investors", I assume that we have
all read the same books such as Security Analysis and The Intelligent Investor
which have provided us our basic framework for investing such as the principles
of Mr. Market and the Margin of Safety.

I believe that where we differ is how we define "value" and that is fine. The
key to investing is to buy a stream of cash flows when they are priced cheaply
and sell that stream of cash flows when they are priced dearly. The "art" of
this game is to determine when such stream is cheap or dear. That is precisely
why investing is more of an art than a science.

RE: "And I have been wrong - many, many times"

So have I; however, I have a feeling that your slugging percentage is pretty
darn good!

Happy New Year.

Regards,

David

P.S. You still holding WHR?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 3:37:46 AM
From:bruwin
Interesting post Dave. With regard to housing and bonds etc.., in my part of
the world we have what is known as an 'Access Bond'. This type of loan facility
allows one to withdraw cash from one’s Bond when there is a difference between
the original Bond size and the amount that has been paid off. This can be a
useful source of needed cash because the interest rate of bonds make this the
cheapest source of borrowed money. What I’d like to know, is such a facility
available in the US ?

A second question ... does the US residential and property market enable one to
own an Apartment on Sectional Title ? In other words you own the "volume" that
the Apartment occupies in the same way that you receive Title for a house.

With regard to oil, and other natural fuels such as coal. I read, recently, a
book entitled 'The Last Hours of Ancient Sunlight' by Thom Hartmann. He makes
the interesting observation that there appears to be a correlation between the
growth of world population and man’s discovery and access to natural energy
sources. Prior to the discovery of coal, about 900 years ago, man was very
reliant on his local forest for the supply of energy. This tended to limit
sizes of population as there had to be some balance or harmony between numbers
and energy supply. With the advent of coal, this new energy supply meant more
forests could be decimated to be converted into croplands and support ever more
people. World population went from about 500mil. in the year 1000 to about 1
billion in 1800.

After the discovery of oil in the early 1800’s the size of the world’s
population really took off. It took only 130 years for the world population to
hit its second Billion, and a lesser 30 years for it to reach 3 Billion by
1960. Not surprisingly the world’s population now stands at over 6 Billion. It
seems very unlikely that there could be a world population of 6 Billion if it
wasn’t for oil and the part that it plays in the provision of energy, heating,
conversion to synthetic products, resins, plastics, nylon, rayon, polyesters
etc.. etc.. If the world’s structures continue to consume oil ... a LIMITED
resource ... at their current rate, what will support the 6 billion PLUS in the
years ahead, when it will inevitably get more expensive to find and extract,
and eventually completely run out ?! Maybe this will lead to new areas of
investment opportunities !

I agree with your contention to "disagree" regarding the definition of "Value".
Like yourself, I also believe that an investor is likely to make the most when
he buys something of value when it’s currently cheap. This is one of the
cornerstones of my own investment strategy. However, the investment methodology
of my mentor and good friend, Dr. Karl Posel, concludes that investing is, in
fact, more of a (mathematical) science than an art. And if one follows that
route it’s more than likely that one will be RIGHT - many, many times.
Personally, I find it hard to believe that any investor enjoys making losses.
If that is the case, shouldn’t they interrogate aspects of their strategy in
order to determine why such an unattractive end result occurs ?

Rest assured, I’m not hear to tell others what to do, but rather to question
and debate particular aspects and components of investment strategies. If there
is eventual, general consensus, by those with an open mind, that certain
aspects are found wanting, then wouldn’t this be to the overall benefit of all
?

I get the impression, from the general fundamental analysis market, that folk
tend to use certain ratios and criteria because that’s what so many others do
and therefore, by implication, it must be right. Surely any mathematical ratio
or investment criteria must be able to stand up to logical scrutiny. It wasn’t
that long ago that the majority believed that the sun revolved around the
earth. However, it took the logic and in depth scientific understanding of a
few, such as Galileo and Copernicus, to prove the exact opposite.
And before we get some inane comment from the likes of c.worth, I see myself as
very far removed from the scientific intellect of those two eminent gentlemen !

Best wishes with your investments in 2006.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 8:43:46 AM
From:bruwin
Until such time as I perceive you’re prepared to enter into constructive debate
or discussion without the necessity for snide remarks and juvenile personal
affronts, you’ll really be wasting your time expecting a response from me.
I suggest you rather expend that energy searching for your own brand of "Value"
stocks.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 11:51:25 AM
From:- with a K
you could at least space your posts a bit more generously, so that they are
readable

Good point, Carl.

Years ago, when computers were first put on desktops, I worked with a senior
executive who no longer had a secretary and had to learn to do his own typing.
His emails, which were essentially lengthy reports, never contained any spaces.
Consequently, people didn't read them as much as they should as it became so
difficult to wade through them. It became kind of a private joke in the office.

Why do you think the four page solicitation letters from political parties or
investment newsletters contain single sentence paragraphs? It's because it is
easy on the eye and it encourages you to keep reading.

I read elsewhere of your fine year, Carl. Congrats.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 2:34:40 PM
From:Paul Senior
Dave, re: housing.

Thanks for the positive comments on homebuilders. (Well, I interpret those
comments as positive anyway.)

I remember the old days when stock gurus pointed to stocks as being the much,
much better investment than houses. S&P published every month a booklet with
condensed stock data on maybe 2000 or more stocks. One of the columns was
current stock price (as of pub. date), and another was high and low price of
the stock in the past ten years. Quite amazing in flipping through the booklet
to see how many stocks were currently up 10x or more from their lows. In other
words, there were lots and lots of stocks where, if (IF!) you were lucky enough
to buy at the lows sometime in the previous ten years, you'd be up 10x on your
money now (on the publication date). You could not say that for houses. OTOH,
the leverage involved with housing (20% down in those days) turns out - imo -
to maybe offset the average rise in stock prices. There's also OTOH though - if
I understand correctly - the Kiyosaki (Rich Dad/Poor Dad) idea that any
"investment" you have to keep putting money INTO (e.g. make mortgage payments)
and that you aren't get money out of, well that isn't really an investment.

---
Aside: about WHR: have sold some, still holding a stub position purchased 5/05
@ $62.85/sh.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 3:38:55 PM
From:MCsweet
GTSI

grscpin, good job trading GTSI.

I thought it was an attractive value stock, but was unwilling to take a risk on
it due to the problems with Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system. Now we
see it is near its 52-week low because it will have to writedown 4-6 million of
inventory.

So I have learned the hard way (see ticker enc) to be cautious of both
companies with ERP problems and companies with accounting problems.

I'd continue to monitor this one, but am not ready to buy back yet.

And of course, I'm often wrong. I avoided UTSI and OVTI on their dips and have
been wrong. I just would rather miss out gains then take big losses.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 3:45:15 PM
From:Carl Worth
characterize my conversation as you will, but i would suggest you read your own
posts first, and attend to your own posting style, before attempting to remedy
the faults you see in mine

as an aside, congratulations on the spacing in your housing post, a noticeable
improvement

that said, other than juvenile or snide, how would you describe your posts to
others assailing their practice of taking profits along a stock's rise, rather
than selling each and every share at the exact top, as you therefore imply you
are able to do?

frankly, any sarcasm in my posts to you is more than matched by the pompous
nature of almost every one of your posts, so like a simultaneous equation, if
we remove the edge to each post, we are still left with the facts i have
stated, which you clearly can't refute...that's the difference, i may respond
with a needle, but it's a needle that comes along with cogent information,
rather than simply, "you're mean, i'm not going to answer" (though you answer
anyway, albeit with a sidestep)

i've had these types of conversations before, almost always during slow market
times, as i find them amusing, but this is now getting pretty far off topic, as
the discussion was originally simply what kind of stocks the board participants
are looking for...i think it's pretty clear where the consensus stands, we now
return you to your regularly scheduled programming

happy new year
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 3:54:48 PM
From:MCsweet
WNMLA,

I have posted this before. WNMLA offers mutual funds with exorbitant fees that
really have no reason to exist given other lower cost alternatives. Also, look
at the performance of TUX. And look who is getting paid to run it. Considering
they have several funds and investment companies, I think your $100K is too
low.

In the past, they have let their stock price deteriorate to a level way below
book value (and close to cash value I believe) without trying to do anything
for their shareholders. A modest dividend or buyback was called for to keep the
stock price near somewhat of a fair value.

I have no problem with delisting if you work in the shareholder's best
interest. I'm not convinced they do.

I don't know these people personally, and I have not dug deeply into the
company, but what I have seen so far is not encouraging.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 4:05:14 PM
From:gcrispin
Thanks MCsweet. I sold into resistance on the chart--and got lucky-- to put
funds into something else.

Recently I have been buying CKSW, which I have mentioned in a previous post,
and BEL. I have traded BEL twice before but am building a position to hold onto
for a while. The company has had some wild swings historically, and at least
two posters, With a K, and Brendan W. have stated a case for buying them before
on this board.

After listening to the last CC, I am speculating that they have much of their
troubles behind them. (Shareholder lawsuit, Regulatory approval on their
Beldune plant.) Not a great balance sheet, but they are in the type of business
that has great barriers of entry. I also remember listening to John Bennett,
the founder of the company, several years ago proclaim that no company could
beat them on price because of the large contracts that they can handle. In any
case, they are an "event driven company." One large contract will get them off
the ropes and they certainly have landed them before. My average price is
currently 3.00 and will buy more if it dips below that price.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 4:45:34 PM
From:Carl Worth
you're right of course that the structure of TUX adds to the income of both of
the winmill principals, but the company as a whole turns a small profit, while
it (most likely) increases in underlying value each year due to its land
holdings...to me it's a hidden asset, though of course it's also an income
provider to the winmills

i guess i see what they have done in running the company as their attempt to
maximize the income of the company, figuring that the stock price will take
care of itself, as it now has to some degree at least...paying a dividend would
add expenses again, and might just as easily be seen by shareholders as them
paying themselves, since the senior winmill owns 10% of the shares himself

also, using their cash on hand to prop up the stock price, by retiring shares
and/or paying a dividend, would give them less cash to invest, thereby also
lowering their potential to earn profits...again, if they can execute the
business plan, which is to invest that cash and earn above market returns, the
stock price will eventually reflect their success

as i noted, this certainly hasn't been one of my more efficient investments, as
i've only now finally gained about 30% in a year and a half, after being in the
red for most of that time, but i feel like they have gone along doing fairly
well for their shareholders, even though the stock price has been depressed
ever since the delisting announcement

thank you for your reply
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 9:26:55 PM
From:Carl Worth
My most favored homebuilder continues to be SPF, though I haven't owned it for
many months. I look to buy shares again when the sector isn't under so much
siege, not sure when that will occur. I'd be a buyer at 30 bucks, but not sure
it will dip that far.

Like MDC that you mentioned the other day, SPF's estimates have not dropped at
all, other than a small dip in Q4 due to regulatory delays, and I like the way
they run their business, attempting to avoid selling to speculators, and
keeping their qualification process conservative. I have dropped by various
properties in this area at different times, and always found the salespeople to
be well versed in this strategy, which (IMHO) goes a long way toward improving
the success of the overall company.

As for TUX, I think it's a low risk play on increasing land values, but since I
did know that it is basically run by WNMLA, I hadn't bought shares separately.
I certainly don't see a major problem with owning both though, as TUX stands
decently on its own, with the asset of undeveloped land, and turning a small
profit each year. Could be one of those that goes nowhere for a long time, then
doubles overnight if they sell the land.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2005 11:14:49 PM
From:Paul Senior
Carl Worth, nice to read a positive opinion on homebuilder SPF. Fwiw - not much
- here's a recap of on my SPF posts.

Fwiw, my core position was established in '98. With more in 8/'99.

http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=6218364&srchtxt=spf

I see I added some 1/'04, and a little more 4/'04.
http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=19669915&srchtxt=spf

http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=20076015&srchtxt=spf

On 4/6/05, when I said I was considering buying more SPF:
http://www.siliconinvestor.com/readmsg.aspx?msgid=21204541&srchtxt=spf

I actually sold a little on 4/15/05. I don't understand why that post and my
file records don't match. Maybe I forgot to file a trade or something changed
quickly wherein I decided to sell. Anyway,
turns out that 4/15/05 was a near-term low, so I should have bought and not
have sold

http://finance.yahoo.com/q/bc?s=SPF&t=1y
----------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------------------------------
Agree with you on how these land owner stocks can double that quickly. (And
otherwise remain near dormant for years). I believe that doubling's what
happened with ALCO after a bullish article in Barron's in 2001:

http://finance.yahoo.com/q/bc?s=ALCO&t=5y

I've had a couple others, smaller land holders, that popped similarly sharply
when they suddenly received buyout offers.
---------------------------------
Happy New Year all and best wishes!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 3:52:16 AM
From:bruwin
Hi MC. With regard to GTSI, you state in your reply to gcrispin that "I thought
it was an attractive value stock". Judging by a few recent posts to the Board,
it seems there’s room for some healthy debate regarding individual member’s
definition of "Value". IMO, Dave’s post 22917 and Paul Senior’s 22914 are
pertinent in this regard.

Therefore, I would be interested to know what it was about the contents of
GTSI’s financial statements that lead to your conclusion that it satisfied your
definition of 'value' ? Would you say, based on his own tenets of 'value', that
Ben Graham would have considered this stock worthy of purchase in the last year
? It’s good to see that gcrispin made a profit on the stock. You needed to be
pretty "nimble of foot" to have chosen the correct buying area for this stock,
seeing as it’s been in a classic downtrend since February 2004, as well as
losing some 32% in value in the last 12 months.

IMO you weren’t wrong about avoiding UTSI. According to Bigcharts, this company
has reported negative earnings for the last 4 Quarterlies. It’s penultimate
Bottom Line LOSS was -$74mil., and this increased to a dramatic -$402mil. on a
Turnover of $635mil. !!
I believe it’s current "Value" is well represented by its 64% fall in price in
the last 12 months.

However, if I was you, I’d keep an eye on OVTI. From a fundamental analysis
point of view, this stock has a lot more going for it than the two above. I'm
certainly putting it on my watch list.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 6:54:54 AM
From:Madharry
My own experience with buying and selling a house that we lived in for 10 years
is that the real estate taxes if viewed as an investment cost and interest rate
have pretty much eaten away at all the gains and the chief advantage of home
ownership has been the tax benefits and leverage as you say. Now that we have
moved somewhere where the re taxes are proportionately much lower, i am hopeful
that we will benefit more next go round.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 7:21:32 AM
From:John Carragher
real estate taxes usually represent the quality of school system. Therefore ,
your growth in housing prices may have a direct relationship to the school
system and a desireable area for young adults to move into. I expect if you
moved to a more affordable area the schools are less developed. You may be in
an area less populated and will be facing huge property tax increases as others
flood to your area to avoid higher school taxes and thereby increase the taxes
on your house as new schools will be necessary to handle the influx of more
kids.

your investment should be void of property taxes.. the alternative would have
been rent. To find out if your owning a house vs renting was more profitable i
would see what rents go for in a house and land as large as you were living in.
I would then take the cost of the loan and interest, upkeep on your home that
wouldn't have been expended in a rental. Of course how do you measure the value
of living in your home vs a rental. another cost of equity in home vs rent
would be what could that equity been invested in and did you take a penalty by
having equity in home vs investing in stocks or buying bonds.

for example although retired for ten years i always maintain a high mortgage
with low interest rates and invest that money in the market. Most times it
returns more than the interest charged with returns from mrkt. , gives me
additional itemized deductions, mortgage interest and helps reduce my overall
earned fed income tax rate. Of course most people pay off their mortgage asap
and live in a home with all their equity tied up in the home. imo this is home
poor. i recommend to some at least take out a reverse mortgage on your home vs
bagging groceries to get bye when they want to stay in their home but property
taxes are driving them out of them home.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 10:20:56 AM
From:MCsweet
WNMLA,

well they obviously have done well for their shareholders who have kept their
stock recently, given the current stock price. however, look at the long-term
stock chart. if you had languished with this stock since the 1980's you
wouldn't be so happy. and i still think it is the responsibility of management
to actually care about their shareholders and not let a stock price languish so
long

also, they haven't done well for the shareholders in a couple of their funds
--- tux and gif. Their Midas gold fund has done great, but gold has been way up
(no brainer) and do you think that fund is worth a 2.39% expense ratio??? I'm
sure you could find a better gold fund much cheaper.

however, i suppose if you have your interest aligned with management, the
quality of their character doesn't matter as much. this stock does have its
attractive points --- i just don't see why you view the owners so positively

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 10:35:55 AM
From:MCsweet
GTSI,USTI,OVTI,

GTSI came up on several of my value screens. It has a low Price-to-Sales, a low
Price-to-Book (< 1), and until recently a low PE with a good multi-year record
of earnings performance.

Now I'm not sure Uncle Ben (Graham) would have recommended this one based on
his strictest of criteria. Not many stocks would meet those nowadays. However,
he would view a temporary blip down in earnings as an opportunity to buy, since
he took a longer view than the next quarter or even year on earnings. I do to,
but not when their is an ERP problem that could translate into much worse
problems.

The UTSI I avoided buying was around 5.50, it is up to 8.00 now. So in that
sense it was a mistake. It only started hitting the value boards after the huge
drop, so that is the only relevant refernce point for me. I still wouldn't buy
it here --- don't like accounting problems and am too uncertain how things will
shake out.

The OVTI looks good from every angle, which strangely enough is why I haven't
bought. Why such a huge short interest? With a stock that has such attractive
fundamentals, I am afraid the shorts know something funny is going at the
company (else why would they short???). I have experience shorting, and it is
not undertaken lightly.

A 41.8% short interest is just tremendous. Unless I knew the shorts were there
only for hedging reasons (say shorting to lock in the value of some convertible
stock they own), I really don't like to go against them, the idea being that
they know something I don't. Of course this doesn't always hold true --- ALD
has done fine with a huge short interest. But I have plenty situations to play,
so I avoid ones that my gut tells me are iffy.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 11:51:58 AM
From:TimbaBear
bruwin

I mostly lurk on this board but have been a regular reader since just after it
began.

While it is true that this is an unmoderated board, it is usually a most
enjoyable experience when posters exercise some humility. Many of us have large
enough egos to believe that we can take on all the unknown bright people in the
world and find "value" where they have overlooked it. Many of us have been
driven by those egos to eventually prove ourselves correct for having made the
effort.

The definition of value is an elusive one. Each of us has come to our insights
as to what that means for us and most have used the offerings of those who have
gone before us as the major foundation of the buildings of analysis we have
developed. Certainly Graham and Dodd are most commonly cited by those who have
journeyed in search of value.

Apparently your Dr. Karl Posel has been such a force for your work. Others here
have different influential folks they believe have made a lasting impression.

However, what I have gleaned from the years of reading the posts here, is that
we are all somewhat different in our approach to defining value and all
somewhat different in our allocation of assets into the few gems we seem to
find.

What has made this board work is not so much its rigid adherence to the value
proposition specifically as laid out by Graham (as few of us are pure advocates
of that methodology). What has made this board able to survive the interplay of
countless strong egos over the years is eventual humility. Some of us from time
to time get pretty proud and cocky about our accomplishments and seem to get a
little more full of ourselves than is tolerable to most of the rest of the
mortals here. When that happens, Paul and some of the rest of the members try
to reign in the enthusiasm and, eventually, either the person leaves or regains
the perspective.

You seem to have a lot to offer. However, your approach seems a bit
condescending and most of the strong egos find that somewhat offensive as, I
imagine, you would find condescension directed at you to be. No matter how much
experience we may have, no matter how successful we have been, no matter what
station we have achieved, we all have feet of clay.

Rest assured, I’m not hear to tell others what to do, but rather to question
and debate particular aspects and components of investment strategies. If there
is eventual, general consensus, by those with an open mind, that certain
aspects are found wanting, then wouldn’t this be to the overall benefit of all
?

This is an example of the condescension to which I refer. Embedded in it is the
feel that the only worthiness of a value approach lies in the approval by the
board (and by you) of the methodology and paradigms incorporated by the
presenter. Do you really care whether any of us agree with the methodology you
believe gives you your great performance? Do you really think any of us care
whether you think our systems have merit? "Of course not!" is the answer to
both questions!

I don't know who Dr. Karl Posel is, I have not heard of him before your mention
and I'm not all that interested in finding out. I have done my education in
financial analysis and have reached a comfort zone with approach, risk
management and returns. Many here, I suspect, have done the same.

If there are ideas of his you wish to share, I'm sure many of us will enjoy
reading them. Perhaps they might even inspire some of the more crotchety of us
(me) to want to read on from there.

Those who call this board "home" like to debate the concepts imbedded in
different approaches, but we don't look for concensus, we look for
understanding......our own understanding. Some of us have participated in many
such discussions over the years and so may not do so again on some of the
ideas.

As far as the merits of any person's "opportunities" are concerned. Many of us
bring our finds here in the hopes that others will look at them and see if
there is any merit for their portfolios. Few find widespread enthusiasm. That
doesn't imply that few have merit, it just means we all have our own benchmarks
we have found relevant for us and few companies survive all of them. It also
doesn't guarantee the ones that do find more widespread acceptance here are
"sure to outperform" no matter how much our egos would like to think otherwise.
Likely...but not sure....

Anyway, your posts have moved me to delurk for a moment. I think you have a lot
to offer but I see a lot of friction if you don't treat all ideas here as
equal, including your own.

What I have discovered over the years is that there are as many valid
approaches to finding value by using Graham as there are intelligent folks in
search of that value. What makes a board work is the humility to to believe
(not just say): "They may be right".

I wish for you and yours the very best of all things in the New Year.

I wish for the board a prosperous year full of great ideas debated civilly and
many "opportunities" shared in the spirit of giving.

Timba
(going back to lurking mode)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 1:27:00 PM
From:gcrispin
"GTSI came up on several of my value screens. It has a low Price-to-Sales, a
low Price-to-Book (< 1), and until recently a low PE with a good multi-year
record of earnings performance."

I would add to MC's comments that GTSI has no debt, no goodwill or intangible
assets. The type of business that they are in has high barriers of entry. So
that is what initially attracted me to the stock. I'm not strictly a value
investor. I read this board for ideas and appreciate what others have to offer.
I use TA for my entries and exits and am somewhat of a bottom fisher if you
look at the long term charts of stocks I have recently mentioned. (CKSW and
BEL) That is the style I have developed in the last twenty-five years of
trading. There are stocks that I have owned for multiple years, for example,
WMI and RSG. Barriers to entry is a big thing for me, so I'm always looking out
for something with a defendable niche. The three year chart of GTSI indicated
that this was a good area to buy. I sold into resistance because I wanted to
use the funds for other stocks. Bruin says it was a nimble trade. I take that
as a compliment as there is a certain amount of luck involved. I am the first
to admit that.

http://139.142.147.19/StockChart_ImageOnly.dll?cus=&co=ask&i_chart=0&inm=5&ind=
&idx_sym=&sb=gtsi&cn=us&size=1&ind2=-36&inm2=-1&ty=1&sca=1&mov1=10&mov2=50&mov3
200&boll=0&lin=0&chk_vol=on&chk_obv=on&chk_rsi=on&rsi=8&chk_sto=on&sto1=15&sto2
5&sto3=5&chk_wil=on&wil=12&chk_macd=on&macd1=12&macd2=25&macd3=9&roc1=16&roc2=8
chk_mfi=on&mfi=14&chk_rsc=on&rsc_sym=INX&ref_rate=180

OVTI is an interesting company and I traded it successfully last year. I looked
at it again this year and passed because of the increasing supply and
competition from their competitors. Obviously, I was wrong as evidenced by its
recent rise.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 1:59:56 PM
From:Carl Worth
i certainly wouldn't invest in their mutual funds, but i'm not opposed to
participating in the profits from those fees...i've owned COH before, people
pay what i deem to be ridiculous prices for their handbags, but i don't mind
sharing in the profits, even if i'd never buy the merchandise

no doubt that someone who has owned this stock since the 80's would not be
happy with the returns...i only came across this stock in late 2003, and it was
a good trading vehicle until the delisting announcement...even after that, it
was worth holding because of the underlying value...i don't have any idea what
the fundamentals were like 5 or 10 years ago, they likely weren't especially
good considering what the stock did during that time

i hope i don't appear to be a shill for management, it's not that i'm wildly
positive about them, i just don't think they are "slimy" as you described
them...from what i can tell so far, they are doing what they can to maximize
profits and grow shareholder value, but my thesis with this stock all along has
been to buy dollars for 30/40/50 cents, whatever, and wait for someone to pay
me more for those dollars...unfortunately, this most recent time, it took 18
months to accomplish that <g>
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 7:56:32 PM
From:Paul Senior
You won't understand why any of these metrics work for value investors until
you stop looking at it linearly. A metric must be used in context with other
measures. Consider looking at it in quadrants or three-dimensionally. As for
example with these metrics: low price-to-sales, low price-book, and high
insider buying. Or these: high price-sales, high profit margins, low
price-earnings.
------------
"Once again, it seems, we have a ratio that many use, and because many use it,
it’s assumed to have value."

I don't get to that conclusion. Investors use price/sales not because many
(others) use it, but rather because it DOES have value, and we see the results
of the investments we make using it.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 7:56:32 PM
From:Paul Senior
You won't understand why any of these metrics work for value investors until
you stop looking at it linearly. A metric must be used in context with other
measures. Consider looking at it in quadrants or three-dimensionally. As for
example with these metrics: low price-to-sales, low price-book, and high
insider buying. Or these: high price-sales, high profit margins, low
price-earnings.
------------
"Once again, it seems, we have a ratio that many use, and because many use it,
it’s assumed to have value."

I don't get to that conclusion. Investors use price/sales not because many
(others) use it, but rather because it DOES have value, and we see the results
of the investments we make using it.

-------
Oops, I goofed. Sorry for the double post. ....OTOH... sometimes you just
really want to shout your message. Won't work though. -g- but I'll feel better
if I just keep this duplicate post. lol.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 8:02:53 PM
From:Dave
GTSI does look interesting on a P/Bk and also an EV/R basis.

Thanks for the heads up!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 8:41:05 PM
From:Paul Senior
GTSI recap: It's an old thread favorite. When stock was VERY low - near or at
net-net - around 2000/2001 couple or more guys here who were VERY particular
about their value stocks discovered it and went into it very heavily. Stock
subsequently was a BIG winner (maybe a five-bagger) for those here who went in
and stayed in until these guys got out.

I've followed the stock and have added to it this year. I don't see GTSI as
having a moat though - they have employees who've got good relationships with
government officials, but I believe that's also true of competitors' employees.
Also imo, it's just a reseller of stuff to the government, and while it might
customize products, its expertise in doing that is no greater or less than that
of competitors who also bid on these contracts. - imo.

In past, I've said I've read very favorable articles (e.g. in Forbes) about
Chairman & CEO Dendy Young's leadership and apparently outstanding
entrepreneurial skills. I'm disappointed therefore to read of the latest
misstep where they lost control of the inventory levels and found they had
millions of dollars in excess and obsolete product.

If going to a new ERP system is a real cause for current problems (and not
something else like poor management), I could understand that, having seen a
decade ago how a SAP installation disrupted a business's performance. I'll
continue to hold this $7 stock. I suspect in a year or so the business could
recover and the stock might trade above $11 once again.

Jmo, I could be wrong.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2006 11:05:06 PM
From:Dave
Thanks for the brief thesis -- it's much appreciated.

Have you looked at ENR?

I really don't know what to make of it -- it's in the grey area, IMO.

Energizer of course makes batteries, but they acquired Shick (sp?) in late
2003. Earnings and revenues are growing, but that is partly attributable to
foreign currency translation. It looks fairly in-expensive and perhaps a CL or
CHD will acquire to compete against the G/PG combination.

One thing, while I show about 13% of revenues spent on advertising, I really
don't see much TV advertising on the Schick razors.

Any thoughts?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2006 5:04:46 AM
From:bruwin
No problem Paul !! I have a good personal record when it comes to this form of
post "goofing", so I can sympathise !!
I agree 100% with your contention that there is no one ratio that gives you the
complete and full answer when it comes to concluding Value in a company.
But, in my opinion, whether one uses P/BK, P/S or Insider Buying singularly or
collectively, they will not, and cannot, in themselves, and on a regular basis,
conclude quality in a company from a Fundamental Analysis perspective.

I’d like to think that several months ago I made my point with regard to P/BK.
Yes, the nature of some company’s business activity ensures that the value of
their Fixed Assets are more current than others, but it doesn’t alter the fact
that these are historical valuations and may, or may not, transpire were that
company to liquidate. Another aspect to consider in this regard is this ... if
that company was currently SO GOOD as an investment, then what are the current
chances of it liquidating in the first place, such that a comparison of its
current price to its "liquidated" price is of any consequence ?

And what does P/S tell you about the efficiency and ability of a company to
make regular profits ? All it tells you is the fact that if you currently pay
$X for a company and that company has a turnover of $Y per share then a ratio
of $(X/Y) can be calculated. What has that got to do with how well, or
otherwise, a company is providing value for its shareholders ? That can tell
you absolutely nothing, in my opinion, about how efficiently and effectively a
company manages the Turnover that it has received. You’ll need to incorporate
those factors that appear AFTER Turnover to stand some chance of coming to that
conclusion.

And what if "Insiders", or by inference "those in the know", are buying shares
in the company ? Fine, they may know "something" that the investor in the
street doesn’t know, and MAYBE that "something" turns out to be a good thing.
On the other hand, MAYBE it doesn’t. MAYBE that new wonder drug will be the
greatest thing since sliced bread. But there again, what if a rival company
came out with a better, cheaper alternative and left the "Insider’s" company in
the dust ?! It seems to me that this factor can be related, or possibly
belongs, to the arena of "speculation" and/or crystal ball gazing. The only way
one will be able to determine the medium to long term quality of that
"something" is when that benefit, or otherwise, manifests itself in the future
Financial Statements of that company, and not before.

Fair enough, for the short term traders who like to jump on the bandwagon of
current News and rumour, there may be short term gains to be made. But speaking
for myself, I’m an Investor not a Speculator. How often, for example, has
Warren Buffett sold shares that he purchased on the stock market ? Does he
trade on a daily, or for that matter, weekly, basis ? And Warren Buffett is a
prot&#233;g&#233; of Ben Graham, the man who’s Fundamental Analysis acumen, I
presumed, the majority of Board Members respected and revered.

Therefore, one can use, collectively, as many ratios as one likes in order to
determine value for shareholders, but in the end it boils down to whether or
not they can individually contribute in some meaningful way to that conclusion.

You say you don’t get my conclusion regarding "Once again, it seems, we have a
ratio that many use, and because many use it, it’s assumed to have value."
Well, I would like to suggest that many ratios etc.. have been formulated over
the years by those who may have a fine understanding of Business matters but
may not have had a reasonably good grounding in the science of mathematics. Dr.
Posel and I are of the belief that one should combine the two disciplines if
you are going to come up with methods of evaluation that will stand up to
scrutiny and have a basis in mathematical fact.

It’s our contention that if one wants to determine the ongoing ability and
capability of a company to provide value for its shareholders, one would do far
better by looking at those very pertinent areas of a company’s Income Statement
and Balance Sheet and utilise ratios that actually have something to do with
informing the investor about Fundamental Quality. In this regard we would
suggest the following, amongst several others ...

EBITDA/Turnover
Profit before Tax/Capital Employed
Long Term Debt/Shareholder’s Interest
Etc.. etc..

We set specific targets that a company must meet, or exceed, with regard to
these, and other ratios. If a company cannot achieve that, we discard it. Those
companies that pass through that filter are then investigated with regard to
how currently cheap or expensive they are. The results of that exercise are
then analysed to determine which companies, in terms of our criteria, are
likely to achieve the greatest increase in price in the next 6 months. Those
are the ones we are prepared to invest in.
That’s why I made the point, in a previous message, that by having overly large
portfolios, for the sole purpose of reducing risk, can be counter-productive as
it’s likely to dilute profitability.
This, as you quite rightly suggest, is not a "linear strategy" but is, indeed,
a "multi-dimensional" one.

Let’s face it, whenever there are relatively large profits to be made, there
will always be an element of risk. I take Marc Hyman’s point (See 22849) that
any one company can have an unforeseen, overnight calamity befall it. However,
how often has the whole top management been wiped out in an aircraft crash, or
an earthquake destroy the one and only business management centre of that
company ? And if such does occur, I suggest that a QUALITY company would have
made contingency plans and it probably won’t be long before things are back on
track again. After all, if a company’s stock price falls, you haven’t lost
money if you haven’t, as yet, sold its shares.

Now I’ve said, many, many, many times on this Board, that I’m not here to tell
others what to do with their investments and how to do it. That’s entirely
their own business. What I attempt to do is to comment on stocks from my own
perspective and invite debate and/or discussion about investment criteria. If
other investors believe that some area of their own investment strategy is
falling short of their expectations, then they may wish to enter into
discussion which may improve matters. I, too, am also on the constant lookout
for anything that may improve my own investment strategy.
Now if some Board Members cannot accept me on that basis, then too bad, that’s
their prerogative.
I cannot, for example, accept much of the content of TimbaBear’s reply to me,
but I will deal with that in a separate Message.

Hopefully you didn't get the impression that I found it necessary to "shout"
the above, because I certainly didn't !
Best wishes, Paul, with your investments.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2006 12:21:25 PM
From:Paul Senior
Maybe I can put this into a kind of table and thus summarize how I view some
this:

You (in my view)
quality company?: Yes. Id. by financial statements.
price to pay for the stock: Any price(?) or method is not disclosed
when to sell the stock: immediately after negative quarterly report(?) or
method is undisclosed.

quality company?: No
price to pay for it: Do not buy
------------------------------
Me (in my view)
quality company?: Yes. Use metrics to id. that include current share price.
Willing to id. by consensus or expert opinion - e.g. Buffett, thread posters
and/or financial data.
price to pay for it: preference: use metrics (historical basis); otherwise:
assess future business possibilities/probabilities. (But purchased this way imo
it's not a "value stock" bet.)
when to sell it: Buffett's never/use metrics/when fear strikes

quality company?: No
price to pay for it: use metrics
when to sell: use metrics/when patience ends.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2006 3:01:51 PM
From:Carl Worth
to the end of returning the thread to its stated purpose, and with the idea
that most of us realize that a profitable company, trading at or near book
value, and paying a dividend, is likely to have little downside risk, save for
some kind of corporate shenanigans, i present this stock which i found
recently:

MFBC

this is a bank, they have a little over 34M in tangible book value as of the
most recent report (Y/E 9/05), with a market cap of 37.4M...in the most recent
quarter, they earned .87 vs .15 in the same quarter of the previous year...they
earned 1.81 for the year, compared to 1.30 in the prior year

http://biz.yahoo.com/bw/051121/20051121005896.html?.v=1

while they did realize 266K from reversing an impairment of their mortgage
servicing assets, the bulk of this improvement appears to have come from
increased assets and increased operating profits

it's possible that this stock could languish for months or even years,
considering it basically trades by appointment, but if they show they can
continue this improvement in their earnings, the stock should eventually
reflect same...meanwhile it appears at least to me to have very little downside
risk, and you get a small dividend while you wait

JMHO, and i have a small position in this stock so far, caveat emptor
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2006 4:34:15 PM
From:E_K_S
Hi Paul Senior - The most difficult decision for me is "When to sell".

I generally will hold on and wait for the company to obtain a fair value to
it's peers. I use the standard PE, price/book, price/sales and management new
buys decision like you to determine a reasonable "fair value". I also compare
these ratios to those for the S&P 500. If the stock is not "over valued" to any
significant amount, my bias is to hold and collect the dividend. If the company
continues to perform, a good management will raise their dividend over time.

I have several stocks that I have held for over 20 years specifically some
integrated oil companies I bought in the early 80's. My cost basis is very low
and any sale will trigger a significant long term capital gains event. My
relative "dividend" return (based on my cost basis)is well over 10%.

The problem with this strategy is if management is out-to-lunch, or there is
some new company specific "liability" issue (i.e. potential litigation), I may
loose my original investment. So the question the investor must make is (1)
have you established an exit strategy and (2) are there still undervalued
assets within the company that continues to make the position a hold (or even
another buy)?

One company that I continue to hold (even though management is nonperforming)
and there are significant under valued assets is Albertsons (ABS). I decided
not buy more but maintain my current position.

Some investors use an automatic stop loss sell order after a 10 % price loss. I
have learned that such an automatic trigger will more often lock in a loss
rather than provide you the opportunity for an excellent long term gain. Two
companies that I bought in 2002 that took patience were GLW and EP. I continue
to hold both w/ multi bagger gains. If I had an automatic stop loss. I would be
out on both with a sizable loss.

EKS
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2006 1:34:04 AM
From:Spekulatius
re coal stock ICO - looks like the West Virginia mine which had and explosions
is owned by ICO. Any bet's as to where the stock is going to trade tomorrow?
CNN mentioned that the mine had a bunch of safety violations during the last
inspection. From this I incur that there might be a substantial liability
associated with this rather unfortunate event.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2006 3:48:08 AM
From:bruwin
Thanx for your reply Paul, and those constructive remarks.
I suspect you may expect a comment or two from me in that regard. If not, my
apologies !

a) Quality Company Criteria ? :- We study and analyse the Stock Market and
Stocks on the basis of 12 Laws (as Dr. Posel has labelled them !). 8 of those
'Laws' are based on specific financial ratios and criteria contained, and
obtained, from within a company’s Financial Statements (I included 3 examples
in my Message 22946). We set percentage targets to these ratios. If a company
cannot meet, or exceed, these percentage targets it’s not considered.
In this regard, I use a freely available stock screening facility on the Net,
to search over 8000 Industrial Type companies on the US Markets (I exclude
Banks, Financial Institutions and Resource Based companies such as Mines).
Unfortunately proprietary stock screens don’t always have exactly the ratios we
look for, so one has to use the closest available built-in criteria. Such a
screen, based on this criteria, generally ends up with a list of 40 to 50
companies. I download this list into EXCEL and refine my selection.

b) Price To Pay For The Stock ? :- We base our decision on whether a stock is
currently too cheap or too expensive on the basis of its P/E ratio. This number
is decided on through a combination of experience and mathematical calculation
(If you are interested to know the latter, drop me an e-mail at
bruwin90@yahoo.com and I’ll explain). We see relevance in this ratio because it
does, after all, contain 'E' which is the END RESULT of a company’s use of all
the Turnover it acquired within the last financial period, in contrast to P/S
which cannot tell you anything in that regard.
Now there can be a problem sometimes with the relevance of 'E', because it can
contain Extraordinary (once-off) items which can distort the result.
In my part of the world, the local Stock Exchange requires companies to report
another form of EPS called Headline Earnings Per Share (HEPS). This number
EXCLUDES Extraordinary Items and anything else which is not reflective of a
company’s normal business activity. In this way, a once off sale of an asset
would be excluded. We then use the P/HEPS ratio to determine whether or not a
stock is too expensive. In other Stock Markets I would deduct extraordinary
items in my calculation of P/E ratio.
If a stock passes (a) above, but is found to be currently too expensive we
place it on our Watch List. The reason being that a very good next set of
results could show an appreciable increase in HEPS. Therefore, if the
denominator in P/HEPS goes up, the mathematical value of the ratio drops.

c) When to Sell the Stock ? :- We generally base our judgement on a stock’s
Fundamental Quality AFTER it publishes its Financial Results because, in our
opinion, that’s when you generally know most about the current financial status
of a company. If it should now fail to meet the criteria in (a) we would most
likely sell it. I say "generally" because there’s always an exception to the
rule. If something should come to our attention, in the interim, that is very
likely to lead to a deterioration in the future fundamental quality of a
company then we would very likely sell as well.
We don’t generally put too much store by what "Analysts" and "Market
Commentators" have to say about individual stocks, if there’s very little
fundamental or mathematical logic in their pronouncements (what happened to PDX
in Sept. 2004, is a good example in this regard). We also aren’t that
interested by what the "The Dow", "The SP500" or "The Market" are doing. We
prefer to focus our attention on Individual companies. We would also sell a
stock if we discovered a better opportunity in terms of a predicted greater
future percentage price increase in some other stock.
If a selection of stocks have passed through both (a) and (b), we use the
principles of mathematical extrapolation and apply it, to certain specific
areas within a company’s past and present financial statements, to forecast
which stocks are most likely to achieve the greatest percentage future price
increase in a maximum period of 6 months. Those stocks showing the greatest
price increase potential are the ones we would likely purchase.
In this way, we reduce over 8000 US Industrial stocks to a short list of maybe
6 to 10 stocks.

That’s what we do and what we propose. Others can, or must, follow their own
choice of Investment Strategies.

%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2006 6:01:26 AM
From:bruwin
Timba, I’m not gong to debate or discuss any aspect of stock analysis you may
have raised in your post, because it appears to me that you directed your
remarks, primarily, at my 'persona'.

Now I found it necessary, quite a long time ago, to say to the likes of dale
baker that he didn’t know me personally, and therefore I didn’t appreciate him
making insinuations and seemingly derogatory personal comments in that regard.
I must say much the same to you Timba.

I really don’t appreciate you "preaching" and "pontificating" to me about
aspects of my humility, ego, condescension, level of care for others etc..
etc.. Who, may I respectfully ask, do you think you are ??!!

I don’t take it upon myself to make remarks or insinuations about the persona
of other Board Members, UNLESS they provoke me in the way you, d.baker and
c.worth, for example, have done. A comprehensive search through my Messages
should confirm that !

And rest assured, I’ve been around the block long enough to have picked up a
thing or two about general behaviour, decorum and the like. I don’t believe I
need the intervention of Paul Senior to enlighten me in that regard. And quite
honestly, from what I have witnessed with regard to Paul’s attitude towards his
fellow Board Members, I doubt very much that he would take such a "duty" on
himself.

And finally ... I don’t see my ideas as being superior to others. What I have
done is question and debated the use of certain ratios and criteria that are
used in order to obtain a particular end result. I have also attempted to
indicate to others why I use the criteria I use. If, in the way I have
portrayed that, has found disfavour with anyone then I apologise. That was
certainly not my intention. As I’ve said often enough by now, what they do with
regard to their own investment strategy, is entirely their own affair.

Now ... if you wish to discuss and debate stock market related issues with me,
that’s fine. But if you’re going to resort to various levels and/or forms of
"personal abuse", then, as far as I’m concerned, the longer you "lurk" the
better !

With specific regard to your investments, I also wish you a prosperous year
ahead.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2006 12:10:43 PM
From:MCsweet
PriceSales,

I thought posted this already, but maybe I didn't hit send.

A low Price/Sales implies that if the company can turn around its margins,
earnings will be greatly benefited. So if you believe in reversion to the mean
in company performance measures such as ROE (like many value investors do), a
low Price/Sales indicates good potential for a strong turnaround.

Also, since usually Price/Earnings >> Price/Sales, Price/Sales can be relevant
for evaluating profit potential of turnaround plays. If the Price/Sales is too
high (and growth not that great), you shouldn't set your hopes up too high on a
turnaround play in terms of potential earnings and PE for the stock.

O'Shaugnessy's "What Works on Wall Street" also touts Price/Sales as the best
value indicator. I don't believe it, but it does support it is a useful
indicator.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2006 1:36:40 PM
From:bruwin
Well MC, I can't think of anything more to say regarding my view and opinion of
P/S, over and above what I've said already.
I certainly agree with you that I also don't believe P/S to be "the best value
indicator" !!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2006 10:04:06 PM
From:Shane M
I've used price/sales to invest in software and tech type companies that either
don't have profits yet, and aren't up to what margins will eventually be.
Software companies in particular take time to expand margins to eventual level,
and P/S is a good metric to compare to other similar companies at different
points and growth stages.

There was a book by Fisher called "Superstocks" that introduced me to P/S. I
haven't used P/S in quite a while, but I haven't bought a tech company in while
either.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 1:14:20 AM
From:Spekulatius
Carl- I agree that we should return the thread to it's purpose. I am getting
tired of long posts with little substance and their rebuttals.

MFBC looks like a decent value, as banks that are profitable and trading near
book are typically at least an OK investment. i noticed that:

a) MFBC has taken over a basically bankrupted small competitor below stated
book (although they got some problem debts with it)

b) ROA has been lagging below 0.5% for quite some time, indicating a pot. value
trap (I like to see at least 1% ROA for a S&L).

I'd say a buyer of MFBC at current prices should do OK. Upside is that ROA
increases or the bank get's taken over, the downside being that the ROA stays
where it is, and the holder should get a return in the order of 5-8% on it's
investment. Overall this seems like a decent investment to hunker down.

I do have some investments in S&L as well and think they have better
risk/reward ratio at current prices, notably OSHC and ISBC (both are MHC's and
trade below effective book but compared to MFBC the demographics in their area
(NJ) are much more favorable, IMO.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 2:40:14 AM
From:Carl Worth
no doubt the ratios are less than spectacular, if they don't continue to
improve, i will likely tire of the stock and sell it, after which of course it
will get bought out the next day <g>

i own OSHC as well, just biding time there waiting for stage 2, so far the
stock has done nothing, but at least it's back to where i bought it...i don't
mind being patient, actually i think i own it more for the curiosity of the MHC
process, than anything else
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 2:51:04 AM
From:TimbaBear
bruwin

Timba, I’m not gong to debate or discuss any aspect of stock analysis you may
have raised in your post, because it appears to me that you directed your
remarks, primarily, at my 'persona'.

I directed the post at you, if I wanted to address it to your persona, I would
have so stated. That you choose not to address the issues contained therin is
of no surprise to me whatsoever.

Now I found it necessary, quite a long time ago, to say to the likes of dale
baker that he didn’t know me personally, and therefore I didn’t appreciate him
making insinuations and seemingly derogatory personal comments in that regard.
I must say much the same to you Timba.

I make no insinuations about you, you do that quite well all by yourself,
although you seem to lack the insight to see it.

I really don’t appreciate you "preaching" and "pontificating" to me about
aspects of my humility, ego, condescension, level of care for others etc..
etc.. Who, may I respectfully ask, do you think you are ??!!

I don't preach about anything. I call them like I see them, but sometimes like
to use a tamer language than what, perhaps, my real thoughts contain, if you
consider that pontificating, you are as accurate on that as you appear to be on
self-awareness.

As to who I am? Just me, just a long time participant on this board, one far
longer than yours. I have as much right to express my opinions as anyone else
here.

I don’t take it upon myself to make remarks or insinuations about the persona
of other Board Members...

Sure you do, it appears you can't help yourself. It's quite annoying too.

And rest assured, I’ve been around the block long enough to have picked up a
thing or two about general behaviour, decorum and the like.

If your posts here are reflective of that acquired skillset, you need a refund
on your education. Here you've exhibited nothing much more than boorishness
relieved only by episodes of being pedantic.

And finally ... I don’t see my ideas as being superior to others. 

Sure you do, otherwise you wouldn't be so eager to inflict upon us all your
Bruwin droppings.

Now ... if you wish to discuss and debate stock market related issues with me,
that’s fine.

Thank you, but you wouldn't be a good foil for a debate. You have far too many
blind spots. You remind me of a drunk in a bar who only shuts up to take a
breath and only pauses while waiting for the other person to have to take one,
so he can jump right back in on his original tirade....never having heard a
word of what the other person had been saying.

I have never put anyone on ignore on this website. You will be the first.

Have a good life.

Since this board appears to be dominated by your posts or reactions to them,
I'll take my leave for quite a while as my life is far more important than to
spend any more of it bantering with a poppinjay.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 3:59:43 AM
From:bruwin
Needless to say, Timba, you're entitled to your opinion, as I and anyone else
is. That's yours, theirs and my prerogative.
I expressed mine, I see no reason to change it.
Have a good life as well.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 7:50:53 AM
From:Mark Marcellus
Bruwin, maybe someday, to someone, you will be able to explain exactly what
relationship that post has to value investing. I'm afraid I won't be able to
read the answer because your post has prompted me, like Timba, to make use of
one of SI's more useful features. I need to use it very rarely, but I'm glad
it's there when I need it.

I am hanging around the thread though - this is one of the best on SI and I'm
confident you won't be able to trash it, despite your best efforts. I strongly
recommend Yahoo to you, I think you will receive much more entertainment value
for the investment you make there.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 11:54:59 AM
From:Wallace Rivers
Anyone with thoughts or interest in Rex Stores (RSC)? Stock is down 3% today
for no reason that I know of. Last earnings announcement was, at the very
least, OK.
Some have pegged the price it would fetch in a buyout above $19 (currently
trading mid-14s w/ BV of about $20). The balance sheet looks solid, good
current ratio and low debt to equity.
It has been lumped with the likes of TOY, PBY, DDS and other second tier (for
lack of a better word) retailers as possible real estate plays.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 12:03:46 PM
From:bruwin
Mark, let’s get it sorted today, why wait. I agree with your inference that my
post 22964 has ABSOLUTELY NOTHING to do with Value Investing.
It just irked me that some folk tend to still play the "personal card" instead
of sticking to constructive debate and discussion about stock marker related
matters.

If I had access to '50% Gains Investing' I would have replied to dale baker in
that forum and not ‘Value Investing’.
Maybe you should ask him why he found it necessary to involve himself in
"un-Value" related matters.
Maybe you should ask him how he came to know about Timba's post that originated
here.
Maybe you should ask him why he did not make his comments in a location where I
could respond.

Rest assured, and contrary to what you may believe, I'm not the "bad guy" here.
However, if you want to use that "useful SI feature" and put me on your
"Ignore" list, then by all means do so. That's your prerogative.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 12:37:45 PM
From:bruwin
Hi Wallace. When I look at RSC's last Annual Income Statement I see only
$10mil. leftover at the EBITDA level from a Total Turnover of nearly $400mil.
Not much room for "error" there I would think.

If it wasn't for an "Other Income" number of $18mil. RSC's Bottom Line would be
looking pretty poor.

In my part of the world, one of the country's largest Retailers, Pick 'n Pay,
has a negative EBITDA. It also gets saved by an "Other Income" amount from
reporting a regular loss.
We have never been able to get Pick 'n Pay to divulge what "Other Income" is.
It also sits below the EBITDA level as does RSC's.
It may be prudent to find out from RSC what and where this number comes from
that regularly saves them from a possible similar fate.

I suspect that, with such a thin and un-inspiring Net Income, RSC may not be
seen as providing much in the way of ever increasing profits and value to its
shareholders. To fairly dramatically increase its Bottom Line, RSC's Turnover
would have to increase by a pretty large amount. Can you see that happening ?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 1:03:53 PM
From:Wallace Rivers
Not really that interested in results from operations. I am looking at this as
a potential real estate play. As I mentioned, one person who follows the
company has pegged the buyout value at $19+. Without any detailed analysis,
that certainly would seem possible with BV currently at more than $20/ sh.
No position in RSC at this time.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 1:06:52 PM
From:muwis123
PRS - I am going to take some money off the table. The stock is up almost 50%
since I bought it on Nov. 2nd. There seems to be more upside though. I am told
Lehman and MS both have $18 target. I hope they are right!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 1:17:28 PM
From:MCsweet
RSC,

Have owned in the past. Have not owned recently, but may take a 2nd look.

If you believe the buyout/real estate thesis, this look interesting. Be
careful, since earnings should deteriorate considerably on go-forward basis.
Synfuel earnings will disappear and they make up a majority of the earnings of
the company.

Also, this stock had a huge stock option overhang last time I checked.

MC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 1:39:43 PM
From:Paul Senior
PRS: Okay, muwis123, I'll follow you. Closing my exploratory position
(purchased 11/3). My shares too few and valuation now too complex for me to
hold back any shares by a partial sale.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 3:38:10 PM
From:Paul Senior
Carl Worth. Nice move in TGB. Relatively large volume too.

I've been chasing it since your mention; I hate chasing. -g-

I'll take a few shares now anyway at current price. I suspect though there
might be a profit-taking pull-back soon and a chance to buy at lower prices.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=tgb
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 5:37:09 PM
From:bruwin
Fair enough Wallace.
You mentioned Book Value currently at $20/share. It would be interesting to
know how, whoever calculated it, came to that number. Hopefully RCS's real
estate holdings aren't in the lake side area of New Orleans.
Is it fair to say then, that you're looking at RSC as a liquidated play ?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 6:45:20 PM
From:Madharry
I bought some today as well. as the same idea worked so well for nto, which i
have more than enough of now. So far 2006 is the reverse of what happened to my
portfolio in the first days of 2005.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 7:15:23 PM
From:Wallace Rivers
Yes, as a liquidation play.
Absolutely nothing exciting about the stores (although I did buy a TV at a Rex
store in '99 when my old one gave out in the middle of the Stanley Cup finals
my beloved Sabres were playing in!)

One take on the BV of $20 is that may be conservative, as hypothesised below:

Rex Stores owns about two-thirds its 230 or so stores. The Dayton, Ohio-based
chain's sales have been in decline for several years, even though it reported
better-than-expected same-store sales in the most recent quarter, said Richard
Weinhart, a retail analyst with Harris Nesbitt Corp.

He said many of the chain's properties have been on the books for 20 years
and are undervalued. Rex Stores saw premiums of 20% above book value on the
real estate it shed in 2003 and 2004, he said.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2006 8:27:43 PM
From:Grantcw
I bought some TGB yesterday also. If the price of copper continues to rise, or
even levels out for a couple of months, investors should start believing it
might hang up above $2 for a while, which will hopefully result in solid gains
in TGB.

I think investors are banking on a solid correction in Copper, which is why TGB
is at a low valuation, in my opinion. But, we'll see. I like the play on the
copper demand from the emerging markets + the potential strike in Chile. Could
be an interesting stock...

-cw
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 1:08:32 AM
From:bruwin
Fair enough Wallace.

With regard to Real Estate plays ... if you are not aware of the exploits of
Eddie Lampert in this regard, you may want to do so. His personal fortune is
estimated at over $3.5 Billion ! Not bad for someone in his mid 40's.

He turned his $900 million purchase of K-mart in 2002 into a veritable cash cow
by buying Sears Roebuck & Co. and forming Sears Holdings.

Should you want to capitalize on Eddie Lampert's success, you could buy into
Sears Holdings (SHLD).

The following stocks form part of his Holdings :-
AN
AZO
DLX
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 8:34:38 AM
From:gcrispin
Regarding my comments about BEL, a 13D/A has been filed by Second City Capital.

http://secfilings.nasdaq.com/filingFrameset.asp?FileName=0001019056%2D06%2D0000
6%2Etxt&FilePath=%5C2006%5C01%5C05%5C&CoName=BENNETT+ENVIRONMENTAL+INC&FormType
SC+13D%2FA&RcvdDate=1%2F5%2F2006&pdf=
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 12:01:44 PM
From:amoezzi
EKS,

Is AAUK a buy at present price $35.20. Please elaborate.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 12:35:09 PM
From:E_K_S

Hi Amoezzi- For a natural resource company both AAUK and BHP are good. I own
both. Both companies are trading near their five year highs, so they are not
selling at "value" prices.

They are well run companies, pay a good dividend and have a significant amount
of reserves in the ground.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q/bc?t=5y&s=BHP&l=on&z=m&q=l&c=aauk&c=%5EGSPC

AAUK probably has better geographic exposure w/ operations located in Europe,
Africa, Asia, S.& N. America. BHP has a bit more exposure to oil & natural gas
than AAUK.

You can read more about AAUK from this link:
http://www.angloamerican.co.uk/

AAUK (PE 14-15) is selling at a slightly lower PE than BHP (15-16). Both
companies have good long term global demand for their products specifically
from India and China.

I believe that any well diversified portfolio should have a natural resource
component. These two companies fit the bill.

Hope that helps.

EKS
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 2:27:36 PM
From:- with a K
FNM: Fannie Mae climbs 9 percent as probe report nears
12:32 p.m. 01/05/2006

By Kristin Roberts

WASHINGTON, Jan 5 (Reuters) - Fannie Mae (FNM) shares soared more than 9
percent on Thursday after an investigator hired by the mortgage finance giant
indicated he had discovered no new accounting problems.

Former New Hampshire Republican Sen. Warren Rudman on Wednesday said he was
still drafting parts of his report on Fannie's multibillion-dollar accounting
problems and was reviewing new documents in the case.

But he said his legal team had the information it needed, and indicated that
nothing had been uncovered that had not already been disclosed.

"I think we probably have most of what we need," Rudman said, noting the final
report could be delayed until February due to new documents.

Analysts said Rudman's comments were driving Fannie's stock higher on Thursday.

The shares jumped more than 9 percent, hitting an intraday high of $53.60 -- a
price not seen since August. The stock at midday traded up $4.54, or 9.3
percent, at $53.29 on the New York Stock Exchange.

"He made the comment that there's nothing new," said Ed Groshans, analyst at
Fox-Pitt, Kelton. "That alleviates a lot of the concerns in this stock."

"You're starting to see a little bit of a relief rally," Groshans said.

Fannie's stock has been plagued by the company's accounting problems, which are
still under investigation and will likely lead to a profit restatement of as
much as $11 billion.

The stock has dropped more than 30 percent over the past 12 months and now
trades below shares of its smaller rival, Freddie Mac (FRE) . Freddie rose 99
cents, or 1.52 percent, to $66.24 on Thursday.

Brian Rohman, managing director at Robeco Investment Management in New York,
said Rudman's statement was a positive for Fannie but cautioned that an
internal report does not carry as much weight as a regulatory one.

In addition to the Rudman probe, Fannie also is under investigation by the U.S.
Securities and Exchange Commission, the Office of Federal Housing Enterprise
Oversight, the Departments of Labor and Justice, and the Internal Revenue
Service.

HEADLINE RISK

While analysts said Rudman's comments were good news for Fannie Mae, the road
ahead remains long and the company faces many hurdles in the first quarter that
could prove pivotal to its business and profitability.

Fannie's regulator -- the Office of Federal Housing Enterprise Oversight -- is
expected to deliver findings on Fannie's accounting problems by the end of the
first quarter.

Some analysts speculated the report would be more damaging for former Fannie
executives than for the company itself, given new leadership at the company and
new financial controls being implemented.

But depending on its content, the report could reinvigorate efforts on Capitol
Hill to pass legislation that would stiffen oversight of Fannie and Freddie --
the government-sponsored enterprises (GSEs) charged by Congress with supporting
homeownership by keeping the mortgage market liquid.

A bill was passed by the House of Representatives in 2005, but separate
legislation that would force big cuts to the companies' portfolio business did
not reach the Senate floor.

"Sen. Shelby does continue to hope to be able to pass strong GSE regulatory
reform legislation in 2006," said Andrew Gray, spokesman for Senate Banking
Committee Chairman Richard Shelby, an Alabama Republican. Gray called it a
priority.

But Brian Gardner, Washington research analyst at Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc.,
said if the Senate hasn't acted by July 4, "I think GSE legislation is as close
to dead as you can get."

Fannie's continued listing on the New York Stock Exchange is also in question.

Fannie has not posted financial results for 2004 or 2005, and the NYSE's
extension of the company's stock listing expired Dec. 16. The NYSE has proposed
a rule to the SEC that would allow it to keep a stock listed despite the
absence of financials in certain circumstances.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 8:54:23 PM
From:Madharry
nibbled on cy today. khdh up a little on news of getting an $80MM contract to
build a cement plant in yemen.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 10:29:53 PM
From:Paul Senior
HELE: You guys were right to avoid HELE.

I'm trimming my position - again.

Here's an example where imo, a case could be made for a buy, given the current
price, current & forward expected earnings, diverse product lines and brands,
and low price/book and okay (imo) roe.

Yet for me, I turn coward. Rather than consider adding, and wanting to protect
gains, I'll instead take more off the table.

Somebody else looking at it, it could very well be a value stock at current
price (or not -g-).

http://finance.yahoo.com/q/ks?s=HELE
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 10:38:29 PM
From:- with a K
HELE: Good for you to sell some, Paul. It looks radioactive with an ugly 2 year
chart; what will cause it to turn? When? I think there are better places to put
your money...

http://stockcharts.com/def/servlet/SC.web?c=HELE,uu
[l,a]waclyiay[de][pc21!b50!f][vc60][iut!Lc20!La12,26,9]&pref=G
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 10:46:24 PM
From:hdl
http://biz.yahoo.com/pz/060105/91937.html
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2006 10:54:45 PM
From:hdl
they consistently ran bnbga and now run wnmla for their own benefit and screw
the shareholders.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2006 10:23:50 AM
From:Madharry
I have not analyzed the homebuilders so I dont know what happens if rates
skyrocket and home prices collapse. its possible that r/e owners are hedging
the value of their homes by short selling the homebuilders. The oil companies
stock dropping seems ridiculous to me. everything i have read indicates that
the oil companies are making investment decisions based on oil in the 25-30
range. even rationales i am hearing from intelligent people and analysts for
selling oil stocks seem specious to me. a good friend of mine who made a lot of
money in oil in 2005 said he sold a lot of it took money off the table and was
going to reinvest it gradaully.
An analyst on CNBC said that although she like energy fundamentally she was
underweight bacause of sentiment.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2006 10:46:27 AM
From:Paul Senior
Grommit, I'll up my ACAS position a tad today.

My suspicion is that if I were to compare my portfolio results - year-end
performance - with anybody else's, it's having positions in stocks like ACAS
that hold down my relative-to-others performance. Not that investing should be
a game though where only one metric is used. A decent portfolio should (I
presume) take into account a number of factors - safety of principal, risk
tolerance, financial goals of the owner, etc.

If the entire market tanks, it's possible that having high-div. payers will
mitigate some of the destruction. OTOH, for those of us who have full positions
or more in stocks like ACAS, where we don't expect risk/volatility/cap. gains
as with growth stocks, if the company stumbles we'll be both hurt ($) and
surprised.
-------------------
Actually, as you know, ACAS has provided capital appreciation for those who've
bought, reinvested dividends, and held on for a number of years.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q/bc?s=ACAS&t=my&l=on&z=m&q=l&c=
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2006 10:56:07 AM
From:KevRupert
ot

mssr bruwin: do you think it is at all unusual that so many people find your
attitude to be rude?

if it wasn't sad, it would be a little funny....people can address the issue
with you ad nauseum, you but you do not have any comprehension of what they are
saying.

you blame everyone but yourself.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2006 11:15:30 AM
From:Paul Senior
Madharry, seems like perception is everything.

Homebuilder stocks have to drop.
Oil prices have to go up.
There's no stopping Google's stock rise.
-----------------------------

re: "I dont know what happens if rates skyrocket and home prices collapse".

I might jump out the window - assuming of course I still even had a window and
house out of which to jump.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2006 11:56:28 AM
From:Lazarus
Paul i added some more OPCO yesterday...

this looks like a great little company to me. they have a good distribution
channel:

http://www.ourpets.com/wheretobuy.html

and with the recent acquisition of PETZONE they will have even more
distribution channels as well as a larger product line.

read the latest news here:
http://biz.yahoo.com/bw/060103/20060103005695.html?.v=1
i like this:
OurPet's also announced that it has begun plans expand its facility from 28,000
square feet to approximately 60,000 square feet to accommodate the Pet Zone
acquisition and provide for anticipated growth over the next few years.

it appears they are serious about growing the business. check out this addition
to the BOD:

"Mr. James D. Ireland, Chairman and Managing Director of
Capital One Partners and Early Stage Partners (www.esplp.com),
Cleveland-based private equity investment firms that
specialize in early stage and middle market companies. Mr.
Ireland has served as Chairman of Pet Zone and is a director
of Cleveland-Cliffs (NYSE:CLF - News) and other private-held
companies funded by Capital One and Early Stage Partners.
Prior to founding Capital One and Early Stage Partners in
1993, he served as Vice President in the Corporate Finance
Department of Salomon Brothers, Inc. and partner or managing
director of several investment firms. Mr. Ireland is actively
involved with numerous civic activities, including serving as
President of The Cleveland Orchestra.

Cleveland-Cliffs was recently rated by Forbes as being among Americas Best Big
Companies. so the way i see it -- they are putting all their ducks in a row for
growth.

time will tell,

Lazarus
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2006 12:26:22 PM
From:bruwin
I see you replied to my Message 22990.

The original Message 22990 was an "advert" by a web site for folk to pay a
subscription. My Message at that stage was 22991.
I brought it to SI ADMIN's attention. Maybe it was that, or the fact that they
also picked up the unacceptable Message, that got it removed. After it was
removed, my message now became 22990. So if someone now read 22990, and they
did know the history, may comments may look a bit confusing.

If your message doesn't refer to the above, may I ask, "did someone perhaps pay
you to write such a lot of hogwash ??!"
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2006 12:44:14 PM
From:Paul Senior
Thanks, Lazarus, I'll check out pet toy co. OPCO. We've got cats that might
give me product evaluations.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2006 1:29:08 PM
From:Paul Senior
EAS. muwis123, applying a multiple of 15 is too rich, imo.

Imo though, given it's a utility stock with a 5%+ dividend yield, with a
dividend that seems to increase a little every year, and given current interest
rates, and that the stock does look washed out (but it's looked worse), I'd say
the stock is a buy for a "Mom" account.

I'll take a few shares at current price.

Like you, I hope we are not too late to the party.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=eas
%EOM----------------------

